Utah statutes.
70A-5-104.   Formal requirements.

A letter of credit, confirmation, advice, transfer, amendment, or cancellation may be issued in any form that is a record and is authenticated:

(1)  by a signature; or

(2) in accordance with the agreement of the parties or the standard practice referred to in Subsection 70A-5-108(5).



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 241, 1997 General Session

